Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Chapter 19. Constables

§ 19-19-1.
Number to be elected.

In accordance with the provisions of Section 19-19-2, there shall be a competent number of constables in each county of the state.

The board of supervisors shall furnish each constable with at least two (2) complete uniforms and with some type of motor vehicle identification which clearly indicates that the motor vehicle is being used by a constable in his official capacity. A constable shall, at all times while on official duty, wear his uniform and, when in his vehicle, clearly display his official motor vehicle identification required to be furnished pursuant to this subsection. In addition, the board of supervisors shall provide each constable with a blue flashing light which the constable shall affix to his motor vehicle at all times while using such motor vehicle on official duty. The design of such uniforms, the design of such motor vehicle identification and the type of such flashing blue light shall be prescribed by the Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training in order that all constables within the state shall be similarly equipped.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 50, art 4 (1); 1857, ch. 6, art 174; 1880, § 386; 1892, § 767; 1906, § 829; Hemingway’s 1917, § 635; 1930, § 630; 1942, § 3885; Laws, 1900, ch. 71; Laws, 1932, ch. 194; Laws, 1948, ch. 260; Laws, 1960, chs. 192, 193; Laws, 1966, ch. 367, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 573, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 441, § 2, eff January 1, 1988 (the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment on February 20, 1987).

§ 19-19-2.
Election from single member election districts.

The board of supervisors of each county shall establish single member election districts in the county for the election of each of the constables at the 1987 general election and for each general election thereafter. Such districts shall be of the same number and shall have the same boundaries as districts established for justice court judges pursuant to Section 9-11-2, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 441, § 1, eff February 20, 1987 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the insertion of the section in the 1972 Code).

§ 19-19-3.
Oath and bond of office.

Constables shall take the oath of office prescribed by the Constitution and give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law and in the same manner as other county officials, in a penalty not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00). The bond premium for each constable shall be paid from the general county fund of the respective counties. The board of supervisors of the county may at any time require such additional sum as it deems necessary.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 50, art 4 (1); 1857, ch. 6, art 174; 1871, § 278; 1880, § 387; 1892, § 768; 1906, § 830; Hemingway’s 1917, § 636; 1930, § 631; 1942, § 3886; Laws; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 18; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 19-19-5.
General duties of constables; training program.

It shall be the duty of every constable to keep and preserve the peace within his county, by faithfully aiding and assisting in executing the criminal laws of the state; to give information, without delay, to some justice court judge or other proper officer, of all riots, routs and unlawful assemblies, and of every violation of the penal laws which may come to his knowledge in any manner whatsoever; to execute and return all process, civil and criminal, lawfully directed to him, according to the command thereof; and to pay over all monies, when collected by him to the person lawfully authorized to receive the same. In addition, the constable is authorized to serve process issued by any county, chancery or circuit court, and shall receive the same fee as he would receive for service of process in justice court. No constable shall receive any fee provided by law for making an arrest, or attending any trial, wherein the defendant has been arrested, or is being tried for any violation of the motor vehicle laws committed on any designated United States highway located within the district or county of the constable.

During a constable’s term of office, each constable shall attend and, to the extent to which he is physically able, participate in a curriculum having a duration of two (2) weeks which addresses the nature and scope of specific duties and responsibilities of a constable and which includes firearm use and safety training, to be established by the Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training in the field of law enforcement at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Training Academy or such other training programs that are approved by the Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training pursuant to Section 45-6-9. No physical fitness test shall be required to be successfully completed in order to complete the training program.

The board of supervisors of the county shall be responsible for paying, only one (1) time, the tuition, living and travel expenses incurred by any constable of that county in attendance at such training program or curriculum. If such constable does not attend and, to the extent to which he is physically able, participate in the entirety of the required program or curriculum, any further training which may be required by this section shall be completed at the expense of such constable. No constable shall be entitled to the receipt of any fees, costs or compensation authorized by law after the first twenty-four (24) months in office if he fails to attend the required training and, to the extent to which he is physically able, participate in the entirety of the appropriate program or curriculum. Any constable who does not complete the required training when required may execute and return civil process but thereafter shall not be paid any fees, costs or compensation for executing such process and shall not be allowed to exercise any law enforcement functions or to carry a firearm in the performance of his duties until he has completed such training.

(i) The Board of Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training shall develop a program of continuing education training for constables to attend consisting of eight (8) hours annually. The program shall be divided equally between firearms training and safety and instruction in both substantive and procedural law. The training program shall be conducted by the Mississippi Constables Association, and appropriate parts of the program may be conducted by members who have been certified by the board to conduct the training program. The cost of travel, tuition and living expenses in attending the continuing training shall be paid out of the Law Enforcement Officers Training Fund created in Section 45-6-15.

No constable elected prior to January 1, 2000, shall be required to comply with the continuing education requirements of this paragraph (b); however, any constable may elect to attend the annual training and shall be reimbursed therefor as provided in this paragraph (b).

The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a constable who has received a certificate from the Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training evidencing satisfaction of subsections (3) and (4) of Section 45-6-11, or who is exempt from the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of Section 45-6-11 by the provisions of subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 50, art 4 (3); 1857, ch. 6, art 176; 1871, § 280; 1880, § 389; 1892, § 769; 1906, § 831; Hemingway’s 1917, § 637; 1930, § 632; 1942, § 3887; Laws, 1962, ch. 330; Laws, 1986, ch. 441, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 586, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 578, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 320, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 19-19-6.
Training programs for constables.

On or before January 7, 1990, the Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training shall submit to the Mississippi State Legislature a proposal describing the training program required by Section 19-19-5, which is specifically designed for the training of constables. The proposal shall set forth in detail the nature and scope of the curriculum and time period of training for constables, with due consideration being given to the specific duties and responsibilities of constables.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 586, § 2, eff from and after January 1, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this enactment).

§ 19-19-7.
Constable to attend justices’ court.

It shall be the duty of the constable to attend the justices’ courts of his district, and to obey their lawful orders. He shall execute all judgments of said courts in any criminal case before them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 393; 1892, § 773; 1906, § 835; Hemingway’s 1917, § 641; 1930, § 636; 1942, § 3891.

§ 19-19-8.
Compensation for constable serving as justice court bailiff.

A constable that serves as a bailiff in justice court for criminal cases may be paid by the county in an amount equal to the allowance paid to riding bailiffs as provided in Section 19-25-31.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 588, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 21, 2007); reenacted and amended, Laws, 2009, ch. 417, § 1, eff August 7, 2009 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the reenactment and amendment of this section.).

§ 19-19-9.
Effect of failure to execute and return execution.

If any constable or other officer fail to execute and return, according to law, any execution to him directed by any justice of the peace, on or before the return day thereof, the plaintiff in execution may recover the amount thereof, with interest and costs and five per centum damages thereon, by motion before the justice to whom the execution was returnable, against the officer and his sureties. When any constable, or such other officer, or his sureties, shall have paid the amount of money and damages recovered, the original judgment shall be vested in the person so paying. The justice, on motion, may fine the officer not exceeding Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for failing to return such execution.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch 50, art 4 (5); 1857, ch. 6, art 178; 1870, § 282; 1880, § 390; 1892, § 770; 1906, § 832; Hemingway’s 1917, § 638; 1930, § 633; 1942, § 3888.

§ 19-19-11.
Effect of failure to pay money on execution.

If any constable or other officer shall collect or receive any money by virtue of an execution issued by a justice of the peace, and shall not pay the same over, on demand to the plaintiff in execution, or other person authorized to receive the same, the plaintiff, or other person authorized to receive the same, may recover the amount thereof, with interest and costs and twenty-five per centum damages, by motion before the justice of the peace against the officer and his sureties.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 50, art 4 (6); 1857, ch. 6, art 179; 1871, § 283; 1880, § 391; 1892, § 771; 1906, § 833; Hemingway’s 1917, § 639; 1930, § 634; 1942, § 3889.

§ 19-19-13.
Liability for false return.

If any constable or other officer make a false return on any execution or other process issued by a justice of the peace, such officer shall forfeit and pay the sum of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), to be recovered against such officer and his sureties by motion before the justice by whom such process was issued, for the use of the party injured by said false return.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 180; 1871, § 284; 1880, § 392; 1892, § 772; 1906, § 834; Hemingway’s 1917, § 640; 1930, § 635; 1942, § 3890.

§ 19-19-15.
Penalty for neglect of duty.

A constable who shall fail to discharge any of the duties required of him, when no other penalty is provided for such failure, shall be liable to be fined, as for a contempt, not exceeding Fifty Dollars ($50.00) by the justice of the peace before whom the proceedings may be pending.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 50, art 4 (8); 1857, ch. 6 art 182; 1871, § 286; 1880, § 395; 1892, § 774; 1906, § 836; Hemingway’s 1917, § 642; 1930, § 637; 1942, § 3892.